Oklahoma, session 2025, SB1054.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:


SECTION 1. AMENDATORY 70 O.S. 2021, Section 2621, is


amended to read as follows:


Section 2621. There is hereby created the Tulsa Reconciliation


Education and Scholarship Program. The purpose of the program is to


provide a scholarship award to residents of the Tulsa School


District, which was greatly impacted both socially and economically


by the civil unrest that occurred in the City of Tulsa during 1921.


Beginning with the 2002-2003 school year, or as soon thereafter as


practicable, and subject to the availability of funds, the program


shall each year make scholarships available to as many students as


feasible, up to three hundred scholarships, to qualified residents


of the Tulsa School District, and to qualified students of any other


public school district in the United States who are direct lineal


descendants as defined in subsection C of Section 2623 of this title


and who meet the criteria set forth in Sections 2623 and 2624 of


this title, and who are intending to pursue studies at an


institution of higher education in The Oklahoma State System of


Higher Education or a private institution of higher education, in


this state or who are intending to pursue studies in a postsecondary


career and technology education program in this state. The


scholarship shall be an amount of not more than not exceeding the


equivalent of the average amount of resident tuition for which an


eligible Tulsa Reconciliation Education and Scholarship Program

Req. No. 789 Page 2


participant enrolled at an institution of higher education in The


Oklahoma State System of Higher Education or a postsecondary career


and technology education program, whichever is applicable, is


obligated to pay. The scholarship shall be paid as provided for in


Section 2625 of this title. The further purpose of this program is


to establish and maintain a variety of educational support services


whereby residents students who qualify for the program will be


prepared for success in postsecondary endeavors.


SECTION 2. AMENDATORY 70 O.S. 2021, Section 2623, is


amended to read as follows:


Section 2623. A. Subject to the availability of funds, the


Oklahoma State Regents for Higher Education may annually award a


maximum of three hundred full-time-equivalent scholarships for the


Tulsa Reconciliation Education and Scholarship Program to residents


of the Tulsa School District and to qualified students of any other


public school district in the United States who are direct lineal


descendants as defined in subsection C of this section and who are


intending to pursue studies at an institution of higher education in


The Oklahoma State System of Higher Education or a private


institution of higher education in this state or who are intending


to pursue studies in a postsecondary career and technology education


program in this state.


B. To qualify for a scholarship, the family income of an


applicant shall satisfy the following criteria:

Req. No. 789 Page 3


1. The family income of the applicant, from taxable sources is


not more than Seventy Thousand Dollars ($70,000.00), not exceed One


Hundred Twenty-five Thousand Dollars ($125,000.00) per year. There


shall be no family income limit for an applicant who is a direct


lineal descendant as defined in subsection C of this section. The


Free Application for Federal Student Aid (FAFSA) form may be used to


verify family income;


2. The applicant attended a Tulsa public school where seventy-


five percent (75%) or more of the students enrolled in the school


qualify for the free and reduced lunch program; and


3. The applicant resides in a census block area within the


Tulsa School District where thirty percent (30%) or more of the


residents are at or below the poverty level established by the


United States Bureau of the Census.


C. The State Regents may consider as a Regents’ selection


process shall factor, when determining the order of preference of


give first priority status to applicants, whether an applicant who


is a direct lineal descendant of a person who resided in the


Greenwood Area in the City of Tulsa between April 30, 1921, and June


1, 1921. If the Regents use Use of descent as a preference factor,


it shall be applied to all applicants regardless of race. The


applicants shall be required to present verifiable documentation of


their lineage. The Oklahoma Historical Society An organization or


individual engaged in genealogy and research of descendants and

Req. No. 789 Page 4


history of the 1921 Tulsa Race Massacre and Greenwood Area shall


verify the authenticity and accuracy of the documentation submitted


by an applicant and shall establish confirm the boundaries of the


Greenwood Area. Verifiable documentation shall include, but not be


limited to, the following:


1. Family records including family bibles, vital records,


correspondence, memoirs, journals, diaries, unrecorded deeds,


diplomas, certificates, or testimonials;


2. Public records including censuses, government records,


military records, pensions, land bounty records, passport


applications, passenger lists, original grants, naturalization or


immigration records, records of entry, or state, province, or local


records; or


3. Institutional records including church records, cemetery


records and inscriptions, education institutions, insurance records,


or societies and fraternal organizations.


D. The State Regents shall promulgate rules establishing the


application requirements for the program and the system for


evaluating applications based on the preference factors. The


application form shall include a small outlined box graphic,


followed by the following language: “Mark the box if you are a


direct lineal descendant of a person greatly impacted socially and


economically during the 1921 Tulsa Race Massacre who resided in the



Req. No. 789 Page 5


Greenwood Area of Tulsa, Oklahoma, between April 30, 1921, and June


1, 1921.”


E. Applicants shall also meet the eligibility criteria


established in Section 2624 of this title.


F. The Oklahoma In addition to the scholarships authorized


pursuant to Section 2621 of this title and this section, the State


Regents for Higher Education shall also be authorized to annually


award scholarships for the Tulsa Reconciliation Education and


Scholarship Program to two students at each of the high schools in


the Tulsa School District for the purpose of preserving awareness of


the history and meaning of the civil unrest that occurred in Tulsa


in 1921. The following provisions shall apply to the scholarship


scholarships provided in this subsection:


1. Notwithstanding the provisions of subsection B of this


section, eligibility for the scholarships awarded pursuant to this


subsection shall be:


a. enrollment in the appropriate high school,


b. family income of the applicant from taxable sources


not to exceed Seventy Thousand Dollars ($70,000.00)


One Hundred Twenty-five Thousand Dollars ($125,000.00)


per year. There shall be no family income limit for


an applicant who is a direct lineal descendant as


defined in subsection C of this section,


c. made as provided for in subsection C of this section,

Req. No. 789 Page 6


d. satisfaction of the criteria specified in Section 2624


of this title, and


d. e. any other relevant criteria determined by the


Oklahoma State Regents for Higher Education;


2. The State Regents shall involve the administration of the


Tulsa School District and a community advisory committee in the


selection process. The community advisory committee shall be


comprised of seven (7) members appointed by the Chancellor of Higher


Education. The community advisory committee shall be comprised of:


a. the President of Langston University or his or her


designee,


b. the Superintendent of Tulsa Public Schools or his or


her designee,


c. two members of the Legislature representing the


Greenwood area in the City of Tulsa, Oklahoma, or


their designees,


d. two descendants of socially and economically adversely


impacted persons who resided in the Greenwood Area in


the City of Tulsa, Oklahoma, between April 30, 1921


and June 1, 1921, and


e. a citizen with ties to the historic Greenwood


community who may be engaged in faith-based,


education, or social, business, or advocacy work.



Req. No. 789 Page 7


The President of Langston University, or his or her designee,


shall be responsible for coordinating with the community advisory


committee and shall submit to the Chancellor of Higher Education a


list of proposed committee members for review and approval. The


community advisory committee shall review scholarship applications


and make recommendations for scholarship recipients and scholarship


award amounts. The State Regents shall select scholarship


recipients from the list of recommendations provided pursuant to


this paragraph;


3. The award shall be limited to a one-year full-time-


equivalent period. Following successful completion of such award,


recipients who meet the criteria provided in subsection B of this


section shall be eligible to apply and be considered for continued


participation in the full Tulsa Reconciliation Education and


Scholarship Program. Any student subsequently awarded such


scholarship shall have the duration of the scholarship provided


pursuant to this subsection deducted from the limits set in


subsection D of Section 2625 of this title;


4. The award may only be funded with state funds appropriated


to the Tulsa Reconciliation Education and Scholarship Trust Fund and


income therefrom, and shall be made subject to the availability of


such funds; and





Req. No. 789 Page 8


5. The awards made pursuant to this subsection shall be


included within the maximum number of scholarships specified in


subsection A of this section.


SECTION 3. AMENDATORY 70 O.S. 2021, Section 2625, is


amended to read as follows:


Section 2625. A. Subject to the availability of funds, an


amount of not more than the equivalent of the average amount of


resident tuition for which an eligible Tulsa Reconciliation


Education and Scholarship Program participant enrolled in an


institution in The Oklahoma State System of Higher Education, or


enrolled in a postsecondary career and technology education program,


whichever is applicable, is obligated to pay shall be awarded by


allocation from the Tulsa Reconciliation Education and Scholarship


Trust Fund.


B. Subject to the availability of funds, for each eligible


Tulsa Reconciliation Education and Scholarship Program participant


enrolled at a private institution of higher education, the Oklahoma


State Regents for Higher Education shall award from the Tulsa


Reconciliation Education and Scholarship Trust Fund an amount of not


more than the equivalent of the average amount of resident tuition


for which the participant would be eligible if the participant were


enrolled in a program at an institution of The Oklahoma State System


of Higher Education.



Req. No. 789 Page 9


C. Subject to the availability of funds, an amount of not more


than the equivalent of the average amount of tuition for which an


eligible Tulsa Reconciliation Education and Scholarship Program


participant enrolled in a postsecondary career and technology


education program is obligated to pay shall be awarded by allocation


from the Tulsa Reconciliation Education and Scholarship Trust Fund.


The allocation shall not exceed the amount a participant would have


received for enrollment at a two-year institution within The


Oklahoma State System of Higher Education.


D. Benefits awarded under the Tulsa Reconciliation Education


and Scholarship Program shall not be allowed for courses or other


postsecondary units taken in excess of the requirements for


completion of a baccalaureate program or taken more than five (5)


years after the student’s first semester of participation in the


program. The Oklahoma State Regents for Higher Education may award


the Tulsa Reconciliation Education and Scholarship Program benefits


for courses of postsecondary units taken more than five (5) years


after the student’s first semester of participation in the program


only in hardship circumstances. No Tulsa Reconciliation Education


and Scholarship Program participant may receive benefits beyond a


cumulative time period of five (5) years. The Oklahoma State


Regents for Higher Education may establish a maximum limit on the


number of courses or other postsecondary units to which Tulsa


Reconciliation Education and Scholarship Program benefits will

Req. No. 789 Page 10


apply. An award to an eligible Tulsa Reconciliation Education and


Scholarship Program participant who is enrolled in a postsecondary


career and technology education program may be used to pay for both


career and technology education and college work if both are


required by the program.


E. Benefits awarded under the Tulsa Reconciliation Education


and Scholarship Program shall be awarded to not more than 300 three


hundred (300) eligible participants annually, subject to the amount


of funds available for the program and the number of eligible


participants. Subject to the provisions of subsection F of this


section, if funds are not sufficient to provide awards for the


maximum number of eligible participants each year, the Oklahoma


State Regents for Higher Education shall make awards on the basis of


need. The Oklahoma State Regents for Higher Education shall take


into consideration other grants and scholarships received by an


eligible student when making awards. If an eligible student


receives other grants and scholarships scholarship award funds


remain after payment of resident tuition, the benefits awarded under


the Tulsa Reconciliation Education and Scholarship Program may cover


any additional educational costs not covered by the other grants and


scholarships including fees, required textbooks or materials, and


room and board. If the family of an eligible Tulsa Reconciliation


Education and Scholarship Program participant may qualify for the


federal Hope Scholarship or Lifetime Learning tax credit as provided

Req. No. 789 Page 11


for in the Taxpayer Relief Act of 1997, P.L. No. 105-34, the


participant may elect to use the award allowed by this section to


pay for fees, required textbooks or materials and, if any funds


remain, to pay for room and board instead of resident tuition.


F. The Oklahoma State Regents for Higher Education may, at the


time an award is made on behalf of a Tulsa Reconciliation Education


and Scholarship Program participant, set aside in the Tulsa


Reconciliation Education and Scholarship Trust Fund funds for the


full commitment made to such Tulsa Reconciliation Education and


Scholarship Program participant. For all academic years,


participants who have previously received awards under the


provisions of the Tulsa Reconciliation Education and Scholarship Act


and who have continued at all times to fulfill the requirements for


eligibility to receive awards provided pursuant to this program


shall be given an absolute priority for continued financial support


by the Tulsa Reconciliation Education and Scholarship Program


superior to any residents students who are applying for such


benefits for the first time; provided, however, that scholarship


applicants who are direct lineal descendants as defined in


subsection C of Section 2623 of this title shall always be given


first priority status.


SECTION 4. It being immediately necessary for the preservation


of the public peace, health, or safety, an emergency is hereby



Req. No. 789 Page 12


declared to exist, by reason whereof this act shall take effect and


be in full force from and after its passage and approval.




60-1-789 EB 1/16/2025 2:53:06 PM









































Req. No. 789 Page 13